New Jersey, session 221, A2435.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The executor or administrator of an estate shall have the power where otherwise authorized, to take control of, conduct, continue or terminate any accounts of a deceased person on any social networking website, any microblogging or short message service website or any e-mail service websites. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.